src-fst-root.lexc.md
* **+Sem/Act_Group** = 
* **+Sem/Act_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Act_Route** = 
* **+Sem/Amount_Build** = 
* **+Sem/Amount_Semcon** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Build** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Build-part** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Build_Hum_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Group** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Group_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Hum_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Ani_Veh** = 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Obj-clo** = 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Perc-phys** = 
* **+Sem/Aniprod_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Body-abstr_Prod-audio_Semcon** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Body-abstr** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Clth** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Food** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Group_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Mat** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Measr** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Body_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Build-part_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Build_Build-part** = 
* **+Sem/Build_Clth-part** = 
* **+Sem/Build_Edu_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Build_Event_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Build_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Build_Route** = 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr** = 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Money** = 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Plant** = 
* **+Sem/Clth_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Feat-phys** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Furn** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Tool** = 
* **+Sem/Ctain_Tool-measr** = 
* **+Sem/Curr_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Dance_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Dance_Prod-audio** = 
* **+Sem/Domain_Food-med** = 
* **+Sem/Domain_Prod-audio** = 
* **+Sem/Edu_Event** = 
* **+Sem/Edu_Group_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Edu_Mat** = 
* **+Sem/Edu_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Event_Food** = 
* **+Sem/Event_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Event_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Event_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write** = 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Veh** = 
* **+Sem/Feat-phys_Wthr** = 
* **+Sem/Feat-psych_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Feat_Plant** = 
* **+Sem/Food_Perc-phys** = 
* **+Sem/Food_Plant** = 
* **+Sem/Game_Obj-play** = 
* **+Sem/Geom_Obj** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Hum_Prod-vis** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Sign** = 
* **+Sem/Group_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Lang_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Obj** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Plant** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Plc** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Tool** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Veh** = 
* **+Sem/Hum_Wthr** = 
* **+Sem/Lang_Tool** = 
* **+Sem/Mat_Plant** = 
* **+Sem/Mat_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Measr_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Money_Obj** = 
* **+Sem/Money_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Obj-play** = 
* **+Sem/Obj-play_Sport** = 
* **+Sem/Obj_Semcon** = 
* **+Sem/Clth-jewl_Org** = 
* **+Sem/Org_Rule** = 
* **+Sem/Org_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Org_Veh** = 
* **+Sem/Part_Prod-cogn** = 
* **+Sem/Perc-emo_Wthr** = 
* **+Sem/Plant_Plant-part** = 
* **+Sem/Plant_Tool** = 
* **+Sem/Plant_Tool-measr** = 
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Rel_State** = 
* **+Sem/Plc-abstr_Route** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Pos** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Route** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Substnc** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Time** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Tool-catch** = 
* **+Sem/Plc_Wthr** = 
* **+Sem/Prod-audio_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Semcon_Txt** = 
* **+Sem/Obj_State** = 
* **+Sem/Substnc_Wthr** = 
* **+Sem/Time_Wthr** = 

Semantics are classified with

Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
source and target part-of-speech.

* **+V→N** = 
* **+V→V** = 
* **+V→A** = 
* **+N→A** = 
* **+Der/xxx** = 
* **+Der/mO** = 

Morphophonology
To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
symbols in the lexicon files:
* %{аы%}  Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel word-final е and presuffix ы 
* %{еы%}  Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel word-final е and presuffix ы 
* %{оы%}  Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
* %{ӧы%}  Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel
* %{яы%}  Stem-final vowel variation when stress falls on non-final vowel preceded by ь
* %{еоыӧØ%}   PxSg3 final
* %{ыØ%}   PxSg3 onset

* %{ьØ%}   for -ам verbs Prt1 Sg1, Sg2, Sg3, Pl3 л н

* {aä} for vowel harmony
* {oö} for vowel harmony
* {uü} for vowel harmony
* **е1** = 
* **а1** = 
* **и1** = 
* **у1** = 
* **ӱ1** = 
* **я1** = 

* **Е1** = lative
* **Е2** = 
* **А2** = 
* **Ы1** = stem-onset archi-vowel
* **Ы2** =
* **з2** = for возаш : воч 
* к2   кочк- коч# "eat/есть" мушк- муш "wash/мыть"
* н2   шинч- шич# "sit down/сесть"
* т2   лект- лек# "leave/ уходить"
* **%>** = 
* **+TEST** = 

And following triggers to control variation
* %^V2IMPRT	 for -ем verbs in й
* %^END       	 for -ам verb final, i.e. Imprf

* **{front}** 
* **{back}** 
* **X1** = 
* **X2** = 
* **X3** = 
* **X4** = 
* **X5** = 
* **X6** = 
* **X7** = 
* **X8** = 
* **X9** = 
* **Z1** = 
* **Z2** = 
* %- 

* %^VoTrigger   for use with acronyms after hyphen о у ё ю О У Ё Ю
* %^VeTrigger   for use with acronyms after hyphen а е и э я А Е И Э Я
* %^VOTrigger   for use with acronyms after hyphen ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ
* %^Sonorant    for use with acronyms after hyphen Л|М|Н|Р|Ҥ
* %^Obstruent   for use with acronyms after hyphen С|Ф|Ъ|Ь

### Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):

* »
* «
* > (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with > as morpheme boundary)
* < (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with < as morpheme boundary)

* **+Cmp** = nouns
* **+Cmp/Hyph** = nouns
* **+Cmp/SoftHyph** = nouns
* **+Cmp/SplitR** = nouns

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:

|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.

|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

## The Root lexicon

@U.Cap.Opt@ Here it all starts

The word forms in Meadow Mari language start from the lexeme roots of 

the following basic word classes: 
* adjectives  ;	    
  adverbs  ;		    
  conjunctions  ;	    
  dependents   ;	    
  interjections   ;   
  nouns   ;		    
  numbers   ;    
  particles   ;	    
  postpositions	;   
  pronouns    ;	    
  pronouns_not_from_xml ;	    
  propernouns    ;    
  propernouns-toponyms    ;    
  verbs   ;		    
  verbs_not_from_xml ;    
  Abbreviation	;   
  Acronym		;	    
  Numeral		;	    
  Punctuation	;	   
  Symbols     ;	   
* Exceptions ;  
  NUM-COLL_  ;  
  urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns ;   s
  ProperNoun-mhr ;   specifically Mari names
  N_NEWWORDS ;   new nouns to be added

Continuation lexica 

Here comes a set of ragbag continuation lexica.

* LEXICON ADP_   TODO: why +WORK?
* LEXICON CONJ_  TODO: why +WORK? All CONJ_ should be identified as either CC or CS or both, work in progress

* LEXICON CC_  conjunctinos

* LEXICON CS_  subjunctions

* **LEXICON DESCR_** = descriptive something

* LEXICON DESCR-AUD_  these are audible, others may be visible or otherwise sensed, but for now just calling them Interj+Descr should suffice

* LEXICON AD-A  also adverbs

* LEXICON INTERJ_  interjections

* LEXICON Puh-a/e    XXX do not know

* LEXICON Puh    XXX do not know

* LEXICON PCLE_  particles, check these

* LEXICON X  for N attributes

* **LEXICON ENDLEX** = and here it ends with the ^END symbol.

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mhr/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
